Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.05.030

Statements and reports public records. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

All statements and reports filed under this title shall be public records of the agency where they are filed, and shall be available for public inspection and copying during normal business hours at the expense of the person requesting copies, provided that the charge for such copies shall not exceed actual cost to the agency.

[ 2024 c 164 s 403; 1973 c 1 s 44 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.020, 42.17.440.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.